Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.050

Scope of chapter—RCW 11.68.090 prevails.

(1) The provisions of this chapter govern fiduciaries acting under wills, agreements, court orders, and other instruments effective before or after January 1, 1985.

(2) To the extent that this chapter is in conflict with RCW 11.68.090, RCW 11.68.090 prevails.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4024; 1985 c 30 s 72. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 107; 1955 c 33 s 30.24.050; prior: 1947 c 100 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3255-10e. Formerly RCW 30.24.050.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.